Arkansas, session 2025, HB1475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-75-113(c), concerning emergency response
vehicles, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Emergency vehicles authorized by this chapter shall be
identified by a flashing light or rotating beacon which will be green in
color.
(2) A roadway construction or maintenance vehicle as defined
under § 27-51-905(b) that is using a green flashing light or rotating beacon
is not a designated emergency vehicle under this section unless the roadway
*ZRC012*
02/11/2025 3:50:51 PM ZRC012

HB1475
construction or maintenance vehicle has been designated by the Director of
the Division of Emergency Management as an emergency vehicle.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-36-208(b) and (c), concerning special
restrictions on lighted lamps and illuminating devices used on a motor
vehicle, are amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) No person shall drive or move any vehicle or equipment upon any
highway with any lamp or device thereon displaying a red, blue, or green
light visible from directly in front of the center thereof.
(2) This subsection shall not apply to: any
(A) A vehicle upon which a red light visible from the
front is expressly authorized or required by this subchapter; or
(B) A roadway construction or maintenance vehicle as
defined under § 27-51-905(b) or equipage of a roadway construction or
maintenance vehicle using amber, white, or green, or a combination of amber,
white, or green oscillating, flashing, or rotating emergency or warning
lights.
(c) Flashing lights are prohibited except on:
(1) An authorized emergency vehicle;
(2) A school bus;
(3) A funeral procession as provided in § 27-49-113;
(4) Any vehicle as a means of indicating a right or left turn;
or
(5) Any vehicle as a means of indicating the presence of a
vehicular traffic hazard requiring unusual care in approaching, overtaking,
or passing; or
(6) A roadway construction or maintenance vehicle as defined
under § 27-51-905(b) and equipage used for roadway construction or
maintenance.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 27-36-301(a), concerning violations of the
laws regarding lights on emergency vehicles, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to
exhibit a red, green, or amber rotating or flashing light on any vehicle
except as otherwise provided by this Code or to activate a flashing,
rotating, or oscillating purple light except during a funeral procession.
02/11/2025 3:50:51 PM ZRC012

HB1475
(2) If any person affixes or has affixed any red, green, or
amber light on any vehicle, this fact shall be prima facie proof that this
person did exhibit the light.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 27-36-305(a), concerning emergency or
warning lights on emergency vehicles other than police vehicles, fire
department vehicles, and ambulances, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) All Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section,
all state, county, and municipal agencies and private persons and businesses
that operate any other type of vehicle in this state that is required or
permitted to be equipped with flashing or rotating emergency or warning
lights shall equip the vehicles with white or amber flashing or rotating
emergency or warning lights only.
(2) Subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not apply to a
roadway construction or maintenance vehicle as defined under § 27-51-905(b).

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 27-51-905(b), concerning the use of
flashing emergency lights by emergency vehicles, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) As used in this section, “hazardous service vehicle” "roadway
construction or maintenance vehicle” means:
(A) A motor vehicle owned by a state, county, or municipal
agency, or a private individual or entity operating under a contract with a
state, county, or municipal agency, the use of which is determined by the
agency to be required for dangerous or hazardous service along a roadway; and
(B) A motor vehicle owned by a public service corporation
or by a private individual, the use of which is determined by the Office of
Motor Vehicle, in accordance with rules established by the Office of Motor
Vehicle to prevent abuses thereof, to be used for hazardous service.
(2)(A) A hazardous service roadway construction or maintenance
vehicle may be equipped with amber, white, green, or any combination of
amber, white, and green oscillating, flashing, or rotating emergency or
warning lights that shall display its amber, white, or green, or any
combination of amber, white, and green oscillating flashing, or rotating
emergency or warning lights during hazardous use in order that other
motorists and the public are aware of the hazardous use of the vehicle and
02/11/2025 3:50:51 PM ZRC012

HB1475
exercise caution when approaching the vehicle at all times while the amber,
white, or green, or any combination and amber, white, or green oscillating,
flashing, or rotating emergency or warning lights are in operation.
(B) Equipage with or display of amber, white, green, or
any combination of amber, white, and green oscillating, flashing, or rotating
emergency or warning lights does not qualify a motor vehicle as an emergency
vehicle or a hazardous service roadway construction or maintenance vehicle.
(3) All hazardous service roadway construction or maintenance
vehicles shall conform to regular traffic signals and speed limits during
their operation.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 27-73-202 is amended to read as follows:
27-73-202. Definition.
As used in this subchapter, “oscillating, rotating, or flashing light
or device” means any light of the type used on, or which simulates or gives
the impression of being, an emergency vehicle such as a police car or
vehicle, fire truck, ambulance, roadway construction or maintenance vehicle
as defined under § 27-51-905(b), or other lawful emergency vehicle.


















02/11/2025 3:50:51 PM ZRC012